Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 16
SAFE ROUTES TO SCHOOL

43-1-1601. Safe routes to school program.

The commission shall establish and the department shall administer a safe routes to school program to distribute federal moneys received by the state or state moneys to political subdivisions of the state for projects to improve safety for pedestrians and bicyclists in school areas.

Projects funded by grants under the safe routes to school program may include:

Construction of paved shoulders to be used as bike routes;

Construction of multiple-use bicycle and pedestrian trails and pathways;

Construction, replacement, and improvement of sidewalks;

Installation and improvement of pedestrian and bicycle crossings;

Construction and improvement of on-street bicycle facilities, including bike lanes;

Installation of safety signs, including, but not limited to, traffic signals;

Educational programs;

Implementation of traffic-calming programs in neighborhoods near schools;

Traffic diversion improvements;

Construction or improvement of bicycle parking facilities; and

Other projects authorized by applicable federal laws or regulations.

Grants shall be awarded under the safe routes to school program based on:

The demonstrated need of the applicant;

The potential of the proposed project to reduce injuries and fatalities among children;

The potential of the proposed project to encourage walking and bicycling among students;

The extent to which the application identifies existing safety hazards;

The extent to which the application identifies existing and potential walking and bicycling routes and the extent to which the proposed project would improve or connect them;

Support for the proposed project from local school-based associations, traffic engineers, elected officials, law enforcement agencies, and school officials;

Repealed.

Consideration for implementation of safe routes to schools in communities with schools having greater than fifty percent of the students eligible for free or reduced-priced lunch pursuant to the provisions of the federal "Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1751 et seq.; and

Other criteria allowed or required by applicable federal laws or regulations.

(3.5) (a) Of the grants awarded using state moneys, at least twenty percent but not more than thirty percent of the moneys must be awarded for grants for noninfrastructure programs.

Repealed.

The executive director shall appoint an advisory committee to make recommendations to the commission, which shall award grants under the safe routes to school program. The committee shall have no more than nine members, who shall receive no compensation for service on the committee. The committee shall include at least one person from a statewide organization representing each of the following groups:

Educators;

Parents;

Bicyclists;

Pedestrians; and

Law enforcement personnel.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 1984, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (3)(g) repealed, and (3)(g.5), (3.5), and (5) added (HB 14-1301), ch. 320, p. 1400, § 2, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3.5)(b)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (3.5)(b) and subsection (5)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (5), effective July 1, 2015. (See L. 2014, p. 1400.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1301, see section 1 of chapter 320, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

43-1-1602. Federal funds.

The department may allocate funds received from the federal government under the hazard elimination program, 23 U.S.C. sec. 152, as amended, or its successor program, to projects funded under the safe routes to school program.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the department allocate to the safe routes to school program any funds received from the federal government under any federal safe routes to school program or other new federal program that designates funds for any of the following purposes:

To enable and encourage children to walk and bicycle to school;

To make bicycling and walking to school a safer and more appealing transportation alternative; or

To facilitate planning, development, and implementation of projects and activities that will improve safety and reduce traffic, fuel consumption, and air pollution in the vicinity of schools.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 1986, § 1, effective June 5.

43-1-1603. Use of funds.

A political subdivision of the state that receives moneys under this part 16 may not use such moneys as a substitute for funds currently being used to support similar activities.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 1986, § 1, effective June 5.

43-1-1604. Rules.

The executive director shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., to implement this part 16.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 1986, § 1, effective June 5.